District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fair Housing Practices Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C.
Official Code § 42-3501.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 217 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.17) is amended by adding a new
subsection (e) to read as follows:
“(e)(1) Upon termination of a tenancy, the housing provider shall request a forwarding
mailing address or email address from the tenant for purposes of providing any notices required
pursuant to this section.
“(2)(A) Within 45 days after termination of the tenancy, the housing provider
shall notify the tenant in writing, either personally, by email, or by certified mail at the tenant’s
forwarding address, of any alleged unpaid amounts due to the housing provider pursuant to the
terms of the lease agreement which may include:
“(i) Unpaid rent arrearages;
“(ii) Damage to the rental unit beyond the standards of ordinary
wear and tear as defined in subsection (c)(3) of this section; or
“(iii) Charges to the housing provider for removing furnishings and
items left by the tenant at moveout.
“(B) The notification shall also include:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i) Photographs or other documentation supporting the housing
provider’s claim for alleged unpaid amounts; and
“(ii) A statement informing the tenant of his or her right to dispute
the alleged unpaid amounts and contact information for the housing provider.
“(3) Tenants shall have 30 calendar days after the date the housing provider’s
notice is served to dispute the alleged unpaid amounts. A tenant may provide to the housing
provider any evidence that the alleged unpaid amount is inaccurate or incorrectly attributed to the
tenant. The housing provider shall provide a written response, which may be mail, electronic
mail, or in person, to the tenant with respect to any information provided under this subsection
within 10 days after receipt of the information from the tenant.
“(4) The housing provider shall keep documentation that the tenant was served
with such notice required by this subsection for at least 60 days prior to sending the unpaid
amount to a debt collector, as defined in D.C. Official Code § 28-3814(b)(5).”.
(b) Title V is amended as follows:
(1) Section 510(b-2) (D.C. Official Code § 42-3505.10(b-2)) is amended to read
as follows:
“(b-2)(1)(A) A housing provider shall not charge a fee to a prospective tenant
before move-in, during a tenancy, or after move-out for services required of the housing provider
to maintain a housing accommodation or rental unit in a condition consistent with the implied
warranty of habitability and with Titles 12 and 14 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations, or substantially similar subsequent regulations, including any fee charged to tenants
for services or facilities related to utilities, trash, locks, administrative fees for third-party billing,
or other services or facilities required to be provided.
“(B) Notwithstanding sub-paragraph (A) of this paragraph, nothing in this
subsection shall prohibit a housing provider from withholding a tenant’s security deposit to
replace damaged items if the tenant has caused damage to the unit beyond the standard of
ordinary wear and tear as defined in section 217(c)(3).”.
(2) A new section 511 is added to read as follows:
“Sec 511. Prohibition on separately billing a housing accommodation’s utility charges to
tenants.
“(a) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a housing provider, or any third party contracted by
the housing provider, shall not separately charge tenants, other than through monthly rent, for the
utility charges accrued by the housing accommodation for its common spaces or vacant units.
“(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent a housing provider from using a Ratio Utility
Billing System to allocate master-metered utility charges to tenants, subject to the limitations of
this section.
"(c) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Common space” means all portions of the premises used in common by the
occupants of a building or structure not under the exclusive control of a single tenant, including:
“(A) Lobbies;
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Leasing offices;
“(C) Business centers;
“(D) Pools; and
“(E) Fitness centers.
“(2) “Ratio Utility Billing System” means a program that utilizes a mathematical
formula for allocating, among the tenants and property ownership in a residential building, their
share of the actual or anticipated water, sewer, electrical, oil, or natural gas charges billed to the
housing provider from a direct or third-party provider of any such utility service. Permitted
allocation methods may include formulas based on square footage, occupancy, or number of
bedrooms.
“(3) “Utility” means:
“(A) Electricity usage;
“(B) Gas usage;
“(C) Wastewater and sewage disposal service usage;
“(D) Water consumption or usage; or
“(E) Internet or telephone usage.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4